Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB772.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 344.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is an unlawful practice for an employer:
(a) To fail or refuse to hire, or to discharge any individual, or otherwise to
discriminate against an individual with respect to compensation, terms,
conditions, or privileges of employment, because of the individual's race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, weight, age forty (40) and over, because
the person is a qualified individual with a disability, or because the individual
is a smoker or nonsmoker, as long as the person complies with any workplace
policy concerning smoking;
(b) To limit, segregate, or classify employees in any way which would deprive or
tend to deprive an individual of employment opportunities or otherwise
adversely affect status as an employee, because of the individual's race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, because the
person is a qualified individual with a disability, or because the individual is a
smoker or nonsmoker, as long as the person complies with any workplace
policy concerning smoking;
(c) To fail to make reasonable accommodations for any employee with
limitations related to pregnancy, childbirth, or a related medical condition
who requests an accommodation, including but not limited to the need to
express breast milk, unless the employer can demonstrate the accommodation
would impose an undue hardship on the employer's program, enterprise, or
business. The following shall be required as to reasonable accommodations:
1. An employee shall not be required to take leave from work if another
reasonable accommodation can be provided;
2. The employer and employee shall engage in a timely, good faith, and
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 289
interactive process to determine effective reasonable accommodations;
and
3. If the employer has a policy to provide, would be required to provide, is
currently providing, or has provided a similar accommodation to other
classes of employees, then a rebuttable presumption is created that the
accommodation does not impose an undue hardship on the employer; or
(d) To require as a condition of employment that any employee or applicant for
employment abstain from smoking or using tobacco products outside the
course of employment, as long as the person complies with any workplace
policy concerning smoking.
(2) (a) A difference in employee contribution rates for smokers and nonsmokers in
relation to an employer-sponsored health plan shall not be deemed to be an
unlawful practice in violation of this section.
(b) The offering of incentives or benefits offered by an employer to employees
who participate in a smoking cessation program shall not be deemed to be an
unlawful practice in violation of this section.
(3) (a) An employer shall provide written notice of the right to be free from
discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical
conditions, including the right to reasonable accommodations, to:
1. New employees at the commencement of employment; and
2. Existing employees not later than thirty (30) days after June 27, 2019.
(b) An employer shall conspicuously post a written notice of the right to be free
from discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical
conditions, including the right to reasonable accommodations, at the
employer's place of business in an area accessible to employees.
Section 2. KRS 344.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is an unlawful practice for an employment agency to fail or refuse to refer for
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 289
employment, or otherwise to discriminate against, an individual because of his or
her race, color, religion, national origin, sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, or
because the person is a qualified individual with a disability, or to classify or refer
for employment an individual on the basis of disability, race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, weight, or age between forty (40) and seventy (70).
(2) It is an unlawful practice for a licensing agency to refuse to license, or to bar or
terminate from licensing an individual because of race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, or because the person is a qualified
individual with a disability.
Section 3. KRS 344.060 is amended to read as follows:
It is an unlawful practice for a labor organization:
(1) To exclude or to expel from its membership, or otherwise to discriminate against, a
member or applicant for membership because of race, color, religion, national
origin, sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, or because the person is a qualified
individual with a disability.
(2) To limit, segregate, or classify its membership, or to classify or fail to refuse to
refer for employment an individual, in any way which would deprive or tend to
deprive an individual of employment opportunities, or would limit such
employment opportunities or otherwise adversely affect the status as an employee
or as an applicant for employment, because of race, color, religion, national origin,
sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, or because the person is a qualified
individual with a disability.
(3) To cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against an individual in
violation of this section.
Section 4. KRS 344.070 is amended to read as follows:
It is an unlawful practice for an employer, labor organization, or joint labor-management
committee controlling apprenticeship or other training or retraining, including on-the-job
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 289
training programs to discriminate against an individual because of race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, or because the person is a
qualified individual with a disability in admission to or employment in, any program
established to provide apprenticeship or other training.
Section 5. KRS 344.080 is amended to read as follows:
It is an unlawful practice for an employer, labor organization, licensing agency, or
employment agency to print or publish or cause to be printed or published a notice or
advertisement relating to employment by such an employer or membership in or any
classification or referral for employment by the employment or licensing agency,
indicating any preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination, based on race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, or because the
person is a qualified individual with a disability, except that such a notice or
advertisement may indicate a preference, limitation, or specification based on religion,
national origin, sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, or because the person is a
qualified individual with a disability, when religion, national origin, sex, weight, or age
forty (40) and over, or because the person is a qualified individual with a disability, is a
bona fide occupational qualification for employment.
Section 6. KRS 344.100 is amended to read as follows:
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it is not an unlawful practice for an
employer to apply different standards of compensation, or different terms, conditions, or
privileges of employment pursuant to a bona fide seniority or merit system, or a system
which measures earnings by quantity or quality of production or to employees who work
in different locations, if the differences are not the result of an intention to discriminate
because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, or
because the person is a qualified individual with a disability, nor is it an unlawful practice
for an employer to give and to act upon the results of any professionally developed ability
test provided that the test, its administration or action upon the results is not designed,
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 289
intended, or used to discriminate because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
weight, or age forty (40) and over, or because the person is a qualified individual with a
disability.
Section 7. KRS 344.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Nothing contained in this chapter requires an employer, employment agency, labor
organization, or joint labor-management committee subject to this chapter to grant
preferential treatment to an individual or to a group because of the race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, or because the
person is a qualified individual with a disability, of the individual or group on
account of an imbalance which may exist with respect to the total number or
percentage of persons of any race, color, religion, national origin, sex, weight, or
age forty (40) and over, or because the person is a qualified individual with a
disability, employed by an employer, referred or classified for employment by an
employment agency or labor organization, admitted to membership or classified by
a labor organization, or admitted to, or employed in, an apprenticeship or other
training program, in comparison with the total number or percentage of persons of
race, color, religion, national origin, sex, weight, or age forty (40) and over, or
because the person is a qualified individual with a disability, in the state or a
community, section, or other area, or in the available workforce in the state or a
community, section, or other area.
(2) Nothing contained in this chapter shall prohibit:
(a) Minimum hiring ages otherwise provided by law.
(b) State compliance with federal regulations.
(c) Termination of the employment of any person who is unable to perform the
essential functions of the job, with or without reasonable accommodation.
(d) Any post-job-offer physical or medical examinations of applicants or
employees which an employer requires to determine their ability to perform
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:27 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 289
the essential functions of the job, with or without reasonable accommodation.
(e) An employer, labor organization, or employment agency from observing the
terms of a bona fide seniority system or any bona fide employee benefit plan
such as a retirement, pension, or insurance plan which is not a subterfuge to
evade the purposes of this chapter, except that no such employee benefit plan
shall excuse the failure to hire any individual.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 12/18/2025 2:27 PM Jacketed